Hawaii, session 2026, HB2268.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  Section 201B-3, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by amending subsection (a) to read as follows: "(a) Except as otherwise provided by law, the authority may: (1)  Sue and be sued; (2)  Have a seal and alter the same at its pleasure; (3)  Through its president and chief executive officer, make and execute contracts and all other instruments necessary or convenient for the exercise of its powers and functions under this chapter; provided that the authority may enter into contracts and agreements for a period of up to five years, subject to the availability of funds; provided further that the authority may enter into agreements for the use of the convention center facility for a period of up to ten years; (4)  Make and alter bylaws for its organization and internal management; (5)  Unless otherwise provided in this chapter, adopt rules in accordance with chapter 91 with respect to its projects, operations, properties, and facilities; (6)  Through its president and chief executive officer, represent the authority in communications with the governor and legislature; (7)  Through its president and chief executive officer, provide for the appointment of officers, agents, a sports coordinator, and employees, subject to the approval of the board, prescribing their duties and qualifications, and fixing their salaries, without regard to chapters 76 and 78, if funds have been appropriated by the legislature and allotted as provided by law; (8)  Through its president and chief executive officer, purchase supplies, equipment, or furniture; (9)  Through its president and chief executive officer, allocate the space or spaces that are to be occupied by the authority and appropriate staff; (10)  Through its president and chief executive officer, engage the services of qualified persons to implement the State's strategic tourism management plan or portions thereof as determined by the authority; (11)  Through its president and chief executive officer, engage the services of consultants on a contractual basis for rendering professional and technical assistance and advice; (12)  Procure insurance against any loss in connection with its property and other assets and operations in amounts and from insurers as it deems desirable; (13)  Contract for or accept revenues, compensation, proceeds, and gifts or grants in any form from any public agency or any other source; (14)  Develop, coordinate, and implement state policies and directions for tourism and related activities taking into account the economic, social, and physical impacts of tourism on the State, Hawaii's natural environment, and areas frequented by visitors; (15)  Have a permanent, strong focus on Hawaii brand management; (16)  Coordinate all agencies and advise the private sector in the development of tourism-related activities and resources; (17)  Work to eliminate or reduce barriers to travel to provide a positive and competitive business environment, including coordinating with the department of transportation on issues affecting airlines and air route development; (18)  Market and promote film production and sports-related activities and events; (19)  Coordinate the development of new products with the counties and other persons in the public sector and private sector, including the development of sports, culture, health and wellness, education, technology, agriculture, and nature tourism; (20)  Establish a public information and educational program to inform the public of tourism and tourism-related problems; (21)  Coordinate the development of tourism educational, training, and career counseling programs; (22)  Establish a program to monitor, investigate, and respond to complaints about problems resulting directly or indirectly from the tourism industry and taking appropriate action as necessary; (23)  Develop and implement emergency measures to respond to any adverse effects on the tourism industry, pursuant to section 201B-9; (24)  Set and collect rents, fees, charges, or other payments for the lease, use, occupancy, or disposition of the convention center facility without regard to chapter 91; (25)  Notwithstanding chapter 171, acquire, lease as lessee or lessor, own, rent, hold, and dispose of the convention center facility in the exercise of its powers and the performance of its duties under this chapter; (26)  Acquire by purchase, lease, or otherwise, and develop, construct, operate, own, manage, repair, reconstruct, enlarge, or otherwise effectuate, either directly or through developers, a convention center facility; (27)  Enhance the tourism industry in the State to grow its positive contributions to residents of the State; provided that the authority's initiatives shall follow destination management practices and integrate regenerative tourism; and (28)  Focus on perpetuating the uniqueness of the Hawaiian culture and community and their significance to the quality of the visitor experience by ensuring that: (A)  The Hawaiian culture is accurately portrayed by Hawaii's visitor industry; (B)  The Hawaiian language is supported and normalized as an official language of the State; (C)  Hawaiian cultural practitioners and cultural sites are supported, nurtured, and engaged in sustaining the visitor industry; and (D)  A Hawaiian cultural education and training program is provided for the members of the visitor industry workforce who have direct contact with visitors." SECTION 2. New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 3. This Act shall take effect upon its approval. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________ BY REQUEST